Oklahoma, session 2026, SB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2358, as


last amended by Section 155, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 2358), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2358. For all tax years beginning after December 31,


1981, taxable income and adjusted gross income shall be adjusted to


arrive at Oklahoma taxable income and Oklahoma adjusted gross income


as required by this section.


A. The taxable income of any taxpayer shall be adjusted to


arrive at Oklahoma taxable income for corporations and Oklahoma


adjusted gross income for individuals, as follows:



Req. No. 67 Page 1


1. There shall be added interest income on obligations of any


state or political subdivision thereto which is not otherwise


exempted pursuant to other laws of this state, to the extent that


such interest is not included in taxable income and adjusted gross


income.


2. There shall be deducted amounts included in such income that


the state is prohibited from taxing because of the provisions of the


Federal United States Constitution, the State Oklahoma Constitution,


federal laws or laws of Oklahoma.


3. The amount of any federal net operating loss deduction shall


be adjusted as follows:


a. For carryovers and carrybacks to taxable years


beginning before January 1, 1981, the amount of any


net operating loss deduction allowed to a taxpayer for


federal income tax purposes shall be reduced to an


amount which is the same portion thereof as the loss


from sources within this state, as determined pursuant


to this section and Section 2362 of this title, for


the taxable year in which such loss is sustained is of


the total loss for such year;


b. For carryovers and carrybacks to taxable years


beginning after December 31, 1980, the amount of any


net operating loss deduction allowed for the taxable


year shall be an amount equal to the aggregate of the

Req. No. 67 Page 2


Oklahoma net operating loss carryovers and carrybacks


to such year. Oklahoma net operating losses shall be


separately determined by reference to Section 172 of


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 172, as modified by the Oklahoma


Income Tax Act, Section 2351 et seq. of this title,


and shall be allowed without regard to the existence


of a federal net operating loss. For tax years


beginning after December 31, 2000, and ending before


January 1, 2008, the years to which such losses may be


carried shall be determined solely by reference to


Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 172, with the exception


that the terms “net operating loss” and “taxable


income” shall be replaced with “Oklahoma net operating


loss” and “Oklahoma taxable income”. For tax years


beginning after December 31, 2007, and ending before


January 1, 2009, years to which such losses may be


carried back shall be limited to two (2) years. For


tax years beginning after December 31, 2008, the years


to which such losses may be carried back shall be


determined solely by reference to Section 172 of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 172, with the exception that the terms “net

Req. No. 67 Page 3


operating loss” and “taxable income” shall be replaced


with “Oklahoma net operating loss” and “Oklahoma


taxable income”.


4. Items of the following nature shall be allocated as


indicated. Allowable deductions attributable to items separately


allocable in subparagraphs a, b and c of this paragraph, whether or


not such items of income were actually received, shall be allocated


on the same basis as those items:


a. Income from real and tangible personal property, such


as rents, oil and mining production or royalties, and


gains or losses from sales of such property, shall be


allocated in accordance with the situs of such


property;


b. Income from intangible personal property, such as


interest, dividends, patent or copyright royalties,


and gains or losses from sales of such property, shall


be allocated in accordance with the domiciliary situs


of the taxpayer, except that:


(1) where such property has acquired a nonunitary


business or commercial situs apart from the


domicile of the taxpayer such income shall be


allocated in accordance with such business or


commercial situs; interest income from


investments held to generate working capital for

Req. No. 67 Page 4


a unitary business enterprise shall be included


in apportionable income; a resident trust or


resident estate shall be treated as having a


separate commercial or business situs insofar as


undistributed income is concerned, but shall not


be treated as having a separate commercial or


business situs insofar as distributed income is


concerned,


(2) for taxable years beginning after December 31,


2003, capital or ordinary gains or losses from


the sale of an ownership interest in a publicly


traded partnership, as defined by Section 7704(b)


of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


shall be allocated to this state in the ratio of


the original cost of such partnership’s tangible


property in this state to the original cost of


such partnership’s tangible property everywhere,


as determined at the time of the sale; if more


than fifty percent (50%) of the value of the


partnership’s assets consists of intangible


assets, capital or ordinary gains or losses from


the sale of an ownership interest in the


partnership shall be allocated to this state in


accordance with the sales factor of the

Req. No. 67 Page 5


partnership for its first full tax period


immediately preceding its tax period during which


the ownership interest in the partnership was


sold; the provisions of this division shall only


apply if the capital or ordinary gains or losses


from the sale of an ownership interest in a


partnership do not constitute qualifying gain


receiving capital treatment as defined in


subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of subsection F of


this section,


(3) income from such property which is required to be


allocated pursuant to the provisions of paragraph


of this subsection shall be allocated as herein


provided;


c. Net income or loss from a business activity which is


not a part of business carried on within or without


the state of a unitary character shall be separately


allocated to the state in which such activity is


conducted;


d. In the case of a manufacturing or processing


enterprise the business of which in Oklahoma this


state consists solely of marketing its products by:


(1) sales having a situs without this state, shipped


directly to a point from without the state to a

Req. No. 67 Page 6


purchaser within the state, commonly known as


interstate sales,


(2) sales of the product stored in public warehouses


within the state pursuant to “in transit”


tariffs, as prescribed and allowed by the


Interstate Commerce Commission, to a purchaser


within the state,


(3) sales of the product stored in public warehouses


within the state where the shipment to such


warehouses is not covered by “in transit”


tariffs, as prescribed and allowed by the


Interstate Commerce Commission, to a purchaser


within or without the state,


the Oklahoma net income shall, at the option of the


taxpayer, be that portion of the total net income of


the taxpayer for federal income tax purposes derived


from the manufacture and/or processing and sales


everywhere as determined by the ratio of the sales


defined in this section made to the purchaser within


the state to the total sales everywhere. The term


“public warehouse” as used in this subparagraph means


a licensed public warehouse, the principal business of


which is warehousing merchandise for the public;



Req. No. 67 Page 7


e. In the case of insurance companies, Oklahoma taxable


income shall be taxable income of the taxpayer for


federal tax purposes, as adjusted for the adjustments


provided pursuant to the provisions of paragraphs 1


and 2 of this subsection, apportioned as follows:


(1) except as otherwise provided by division (2) of


this subparagraph, taxable income of an insurance


company for a taxable year shall be apportioned


to this state by multiplying such income by a


fraction, the numerator of which is the direct


premiums written for insurance on property or


risks in this state, and the denominator of which


is the direct premiums written for insurance on


property or risks everywhere. For purposes of


this subsection, the term “direct premiums


written” means the total amount of direct


premiums written, assessments and annuity


considerations as reported for the taxable year


on the annual statement filed by the company with


the Insurance Commissioner in the form approved


by the National Association of Insurance


Commissioners, or such other form as may be


prescribed in lieu thereof,



Req. No. 67 Page 8


(2) if the principal source of premiums written by an


insurance company consists of premiums for


reinsurance accepted by it, the taxable income of


such company shall be apportioned to this state


by multiplying such income by a fraction, the


numerator of which is the sum of (a) direct


premiums written for insurance on property or


risks in this state, plus (b) premiums written


for reinsurance accepted in respect of property


or risks in this state, and the denominator of


which is the sum of (c) direct premiums written


for insurance on property or risks everywhere,


plus (d) premiums written for reinsurance


accepted in respect of property or risks


everywhere. For purposes of this paragraph,


premiums written for reinsurance accepted in


respect of property or risks in this state,


whether or not otherwise determinable, may at the


election of the company be determined on the


basis of the proportion which premiums written


for insurance accepted from companies


commercially domiciled in Oklahoma this state


bears to premiums written for reinsurance


accepted from all sources, or alternatively in

Req. No. 67 Page 9


the proportion which the sum of the direct


premiums written for insurance on property or


risks in this state by each ceding company from


which reinsurance is accepted bears to the sum of


the total direct premiums written by each such


ceding company for the taxable year.


5. The net income or loss remaining after the separate


allocation in paragraph 4 of this subsection, being that which is


derived from a unitary business enterprise, shall be apportioned to


this state on the basis of the arithmetical average of three factors


consisting of property, payroll and sales or gross revenue


enumerated as subparagraphs a, b and c of this paragraph. Net


income or loss as used in this paragraph includes that derived from


patent or copyright royalties, purchase discounts, and interest on


accounts receivable relating to or arising from a business activity,


the income from which is apportioned pursuant to this subsection,


including the sale or other disposition of such property and any


other property used in the unitary enterprise. Deductions used in


computing such net income or loss shall not include taxes based on


or measured by income. Provided, for corporations whose property


for purposes of the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title has an


initial investment cost equaling or exceeding Two Hundred Million


Dollars ($200,000,000.00) and such investment is made on or after


July 1, 1997, or for corporations which expand their property or

Req. No. 67 Page 10


facilities in this state and such expansion has an investment cost


equaling or exceeding Two Hundred Million Dollars ($200,000,000.00)


over a period not to exceed three (3) years, and such expansion is


commenced on or after January 1, 2000, the three factors shall be


apportioned with property and payroll, each comprising twenty-five


percent (25%) of the apportionment factor and sales comprising fifty


percent (50%) of the apportionment factor. The apportionment


factors shall be computed as follows:


a. The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of


which is the average value of the taxpayer’s real and


tangible personal property owned or rented and used in


this state during the tax period and the denominator


of which is the average value of all the taxpayer’s


real and tangible personal property everywhere owned


or rented and used during the tax period.


(1) Property, the income from which is separately


allocated in paragraph 4 of this subsection,


shall not be included in determining this


fraction. The numerator of the fraction shall


include a portion of the investment in


transportation and other equipment having no


fixed situs, such as rolling stock, buses, trucks


and trailers, including machinery and equipment


carried thereon, airplanes, salespersons’

Req. No. 67 Page 11


automobiles and other similar equipment, in the


proportion that miles traveled in Oklahoma this


state by such equipment bears to total miles


traveled,


(2) Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at its


original cost. Property rented by the taxpayer


is valued at eight times the net annual rental


rate. Net annual rental rate is the annual


rental rate paid by the taxpayer, less any annual


rental rate received by the taxpayer from


subrentals,


(3) The average value of property shall be determined


by averaging the values at the beginning and


ending of the tax period but the Oklahoma Tax


Commission may require the averaging of monthly


values during the tax period if reasonably


required to reflect properly the average value of


the taxpayer’s property;


b. The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of


which is the total compensation for services rendered


in the state during the tax period, and the


denominator of which is the total compensation for


services rendered everywhere during the tax period.


“Compensation”, as used in this subsection, means

Req. No. 67 Page 12


those paid-for services to the extent related to the


unitary business but does not include officers’


salaries, wages and other compensation.


(1) In the case of a transportation enterprise, the


numerator of the fraction shall include a portion


of such expenditure in connection with employees


operating equipment over a fixed route, such as


railroad employees, airline pilots, or bus


drivers, in this state only a part of the time,


in the proportion that mileage traveled in


Oklahoma this state bears to total mileage


traveled by such employees,


(2) In any case the numerator of the fraction shall


include a portion of such expenditures in


connection with itinerant employees, such as


traveling salespersons, in this state only a part


of the time, in the proportion that time spent in


Oklahoma this state bears to total time spent in


furtherance of the enterprise by such employees;


c. The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of which


is the total sales or gross revenue of the taxpayer in


this state during the tax period, and the denominator


of which is the total sales or gross revenue of the


taxpayer everywhere during the tax period. “Sales”,

Req. No. 67 Page 13


as used in this subsection, does not include sales or


gross revenue which are separately allocated in


paragraph 4 of this subsection.


(1) Sales of tangible personal property have a situs


in this state if the property is delivered or


shipped to a purchaser other than the United


States government, within this state regardless


of the FOB Freight on Board (FOB) point or other


conditions of the sale; or the property is


shipped from an office, store, warehouse, factory


or other place of storage in this state and (a)


the purchaser is the United States government or


(b) the taxpayer is not doing business in the


state of the destination of the shipment.


(2) In the case of a railroad or interurban railway


enterprise, the numerator of the fraction shall


not be less than the allocation of revenues to


this state as shown in its annual report to the


Corporation Commission.


(3) In the case of an airline, truck or bus


enterprise or freight car, tank car, refrigerator


car or other railroad equipment enterprise, the


numerator of the fraction shall include a portion


of revenue from interstate transportation in the

Req. No. 67 Page 14


proportion that interstate mileage traveled in


Oklahoma this state bears to total interstate


mileage traveled.


(4) In the case of an oil, gasoline or gas pipeline


enterprise, the numerator of the fraction shall


be either the total of traffic units of the


enterprise within Oklahoma this state or the


revenue allocated to Oklahoma this state based


upon miles moved, at the option of the taxpayer,


and the denominator of which shall be the total


of traffic units of the enterprise or the revenue


of the enterprise everywhere as appropriate to


the numerator. A “traffic unit” is hereby


defined as the transportation for a distance of


one (1) mile of one (1) barrel of oil, one (1)


gallon of gasoline or one thousand (1,000) cubic


feet of natural or casinghead gas, as the case


may be.


(5) In the case of a telephone or telegraph or other


communication enterprise, the numerator of the


fraction shall include that portion of the


interstate revenue as is allocated pursuant to


the accounting procedures prescribed by the


Federal Communications Commission; provided that

Req. No. 67 Page 15


in respect to each corporation or business entity


required by the Federal Communications Commission


to keep its books and records in accordance with


a uniform system of accounts prescribed by such


Commission, the intrastate net income shall be


determined separately in the manner provided by


such uniform system of accounts and only the


interstate income shall be subject to allocation


pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.


Provided further, that the gross revenue factors


shall be those as are determined pursuant to the


accounting procedures prescribed by the Federal


Communications Commission.


In any case where the apportionment of the three factors


prescribed in this paragraph attributes to Oklahoma this state a


portion of net income of the enterprise out of all appropriate


proportion to the property owned and/or business transacted within


this state, because of the fact that one or more of the factors so


prescribed are not employed to any appreciable extent in furtherance


of the enterprise; or because one or more factors not so prescribed


are employed to a considerable extent in furtherance of the


enterprise; or because of other reasons, the Tax Commission is


empowered to permit, after a showing by taxpayer that an excessive


portion of net income has been attributed to Oklahoma this state, or

Req. No. 67 Page 16


require, when in its judgment an insufficient portion of net income


has been attributed to Oklahoma this state, the elimination,


substitution, or use of additional factors, or reduction or increase


in the weight of such prescribed factors. Provided, however, that


any such variance from such prescribed factors which has the effect


of increasing the portion of net income attributable to Oklahoma


this state must not be inherently arbitrary, and application of the


recomputed final apportionment to the net income of the enterprise


must attribute to Oklahoma this state only a reasonable portion


thereof.


6. For calendar years 1997 and 1998, the owner of a new or


expanded agricultural commodity processing facility in this state


may exclude from Oklahoma taxable income, or in the case of an


individual, the Oklahoma adjusted gross income, fifteen percent


(15%) of the investment by the owner in the new or expanded


agricultural commodity processing facility. For calendar year 1999,


and all subsequent years, the percentage, not to exceed fifteen


percent (15%), available to the owner of a new or expanded


agricultural commodity processing facility in this state claiming


the exemption shall be adjusted annually so that the total estimated


reduction in tax liability does not exceed One Million Dollars


($1,000,000.00) annually. The Tax Commission shall promulgate rules


for determining the percentage of the investment which each eligible


taxpayer may exclude. The exclusion provided by this paragraph

Req. No. 67 Page 17


shall be taken in the taxable year when the investment is made. In


the event the total reduction in tax liability authorized by this


paragraph exceeds One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in any


calendar year, the Tax Commission shall permit any excess over One


Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) and shall factor such excess into


the percentage for subsequent years. Any amount of the exemption


permitted to be excluded pursuant to the provisions of this


paragraph but not used in any year may be carried forward as an


exemption from income pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph


for a period not exceeding six (6) years following the year in which


the investment was originally made.


For purposes of this paragraph:


a. “Agricultural commodity processing facility” means


building buildings, structures, fixtures and


improvements used or operated primarily for the


processing or production of marketable products from


agricultural commodities. The term shall also mean a


dairy operation that requires a depreciable investment


of at least Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($250,000.00) and which produces milk from dairy cows.


The term does not include a facility that provides


only, and nothing more than, storage, cleaning, drying


or transportation of agricultural commodities, and



Req. No. 67 Page 18


b. “Facility” means each part of the facility which is


used in a process primarily for:


(1) the processing of agricultural commodities,


including receiving or storing agricultural


commodities, or the production of milk at a dairy


operation,


(2) transporting the agricultural commodities or


product before, during or after the processing,


or


(3) packaging or otherwise preparing the product for


sale or shipment.


7. Despite any provision to the contrary in paragraph 3 of this


subsection, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1999, in


the case of a taxpayer which has a farming loss, such farming loss


shall be considered a net operating loss carryback in accordance


with and to the extent of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 172(b)(G) 172(b)(1)(B). However, the


amount of the net operating loss carryback shall not exceed the


lesser of:


a. Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00), or


b. the loss properly shown on Schedule F of the Internal


Revenue Service Form 1040 reduced by one-half (1/2) of


the income from all other sources other than reflected


on Schedule F.

Req. No. 67 Page 19


8. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 1995, all


qualified wages equal to the federal income tax credit set forth in


U.S.C.A., Section 45A, shall be deducted from taxable income.


The deduction allowed pursuant to this paragraph shall only be


permitted for the tax years in which the federal tax credit pursuant


to 26 U.S.C.A., Section 45A, is allowed. For purposes of this


paragraph, “qualified wages” means those wages used to calculate the


federal credit pursuant to 26 U.S.C.A., Section 45A.


9. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, an


employer that is eligible for and utilizes the Safety Pays OSHA


Consultation Service provided by the Oklahoma Department of Labor


shall receive an exemption from taxable income in the amount of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for the tax year that the service is


utilized.


10. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010,


there shall be added to Oklahoma taxable income an amount equal to


the amount of deferred income not included in such taxable income


pursuant to Section 108(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986


as amended by Section 1231 of the American Recovery and Reinvestment


Act of 2009 (P.L. No. 111-5). There shall be subtracted from


Oklahoma taxable income an amount equal to the amount of deferred


income included in such taxable income pursuant to Section 108(i)(1)


of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended by Section 1231 of


the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (P.L. No. 111-5).

Req. No. 67 Page 20


11. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019,


there shall be subtracted from Oklahoma taxable income or adjusted


gross income any item of income or gain, and there shall be added to


Oklahoma taxable income or adjusted gross income any item of loss or


deduction that in the absence of an election pursuant to the


provisions of the Pass-Through Entity Tax Equity Act of 2019 would


be allocated to a member or to an indirect member of an electing


pass-through entity pursuant to Section 2351 et seq. of this title,


if (i) the electing pass-through entity has accounted for such item


in computing its Oklahoma net entity income or loss pursuant to the


provisions of the Pass-Through Entity Tax Equity Act of 2019, and


(ii) the total amount of tax attributable to any resulting Oklahoma


net entity income has been paid. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall


promulgate rules for the reporting of such exclusion to direct and


indirect members of the electing pass-through entity. As used in


this paragraph, “electing pass-through entity”, “indirect member”,


and “member” shall be defined in the same manner as prescribed by


Section 2355.1P-2 of this title. Notwithstanding the application of


this paragraph, the adjusted tax basis of any ownership interest in


a pass-through entity for purposes of Section 2351 et seq. of this


title shall be equal to its adjusted tax basis for federal income


tax purposes.


B. 1. The taxable income of any corporation shall be further


adjusted to arrive at Oklahoma taxable income, except those

Req. No. 67 Page 21


corporations electing treatment as provided in subchapter S of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 1361


et seq., and Section 2365 of this title, deductions pursuant to the


provisions of the Accelerated Cost Recovery System as defined


provided and allowed in the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981,


Public Law 97-34, 26 U.S.C., Section 168, for depreciation of assets


placed into service after December 31, 1981, shall not be allowed in


calculating Oklahoma taxable income. Such corporations shall be


allowed a deduction for depreciation of assets placed into service


after December 31, 1981, in accordance with provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 1 et


seq., in effect immediately prior to the enactment of the


Accelerated Cost Recovery System. The Oklahoma tax basis for all


such assets placed into service after December 31, 1981, calculated


in this section shall be retained and utilized for all Oklahoma


income tax purposes through the final disposition of such assets.


Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Oklahoma Income Tax


Act, Section 2351 et seq. of this title, or of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, to the contrary, this subsection shall


control calculation of depreciation of assets placed into service


after December 31, 1981, and before January 1, 1983.


For assets placed in service and held by a corporation in which


accelerated cost recovery system the Accelerated Cost Recovery


System was previously disallowed, an adjustment to taxable income is

Req. No. 67 Page 22


required in the first taxable year beginning after December 31,


1982, to reconcile the basis of such assets to the basis allowed in


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The purpose of this


adjustment is to equalize the basis and allowance for depreciation


accounts between that reported to the Internal Revenue Service and


that reported to Oklahoma this state.


2. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and


ending on or before December 31, 2009, there shall be added to


Oklahoma taxable income any amount in excess of One Hundred Seventy-


five Thousand Dollars ($175,000.00) which has been deducted as a


small business expense under Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, Section 179 as provided in the American Recovery and


Reinvestment Act of 2009.


C. 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1987, the


taxable income of any corporation shall be further adjusted to


arrive at Oklahoma taxable income for transfers of technology to


qualified small businesses located in Oklahoma this state. Such


transferor corporation shall be allowed an exemption from taxable


income of an amount equal to the amount of royalty payment received


as a result of such transfer; provided, however, such amount shall


not exceed ten percent (10%) of the amount of gross proceeds


received by such transferor corporation as a result of the


technology transfer. Such exemption shall be allowed for a period


not to exceed ten (10) years from the date of receipt of the first

Req. No. 67 Page 23


royalty payment accruing from such transfer. No exemption may be


claimed for transfers of technology to qualified small businesses


made prior to January 1, 1988.


2. For purposes of this subsection:


a. “Qualified small business” means an entity, whether


organized as a corporation, partnership, or


proprietorship, organized for profit with its


principal place of business located within this state


and which meets the following criteria:


(1) Capitalization of not more than Two Hundred Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00),


(2) Having at least fifty percent (50%) of its


employees and assets located in Oklahoma this


state at the time of the transfer, and


(3) Not a subsidiary or affiliate of the transferor


corporation;


b. “Technology” means a proprietary process, formula,


pattern, device or compilation of scientific or


technical information which is not in the public


domain;


c. “Transferor corporation” means a corporation which is


the exclusive and undisputed owner of the technology


at the time the transfer is made; and



Req. No. 67 Page 24


d. “Gross proceeds” means the total amount of


consideration for the transfer of technology, whether


the consideration is in money or otherwise.


D. 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, the


taxable income of any corporation, estate or trust, shall be further


adjusted for qualifying gains receiving capital treatment. Such


corporations, estates or trusts shall be allowed a deduction from


Oklahoma taxable income for the amount of qualifying gains receiving


capital treatment earned by the corporation, estate or trust during


the taxable year and included in the federal taxable income of such


corporation, estate or trust.


2. As used in this subsection:


a. “qualifying gains receiving capital treatment” means


the amount of net capital gains, as defined in Section


1222(11) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, included in the federal income tax return of


the corporation, estate or trust that result from:


(1) the sale of real property or tangible personal


property located within Oklahoma this state that


has been directly or indirectly owned by the


corporation, estate or trust for a holding period


of at least five (5) years prior to the date of


the transaction from which such net capital gains


arise,

Req. No. 67 Page 25


(2) the sale of stock or on the sale of an ownership


interest in an Oklahoma company, limited


liability company, or partnership where such


stock or ownership interest has been directly or


indirectly owned by the corporation, estate or


trust for a holding period of at least three (3)


years prior to the date of the transaction from


which the net capital gains arise, or


(3) the sale of real property, tangible personal


property or intangible personal property located


within Oklahoma this state as part of the sale of


all or substantially all of the assets of an


Oklahoma company, limited liability company, or


partnership where such property has been directly


or indirectly owned by such entity owned by the


owners of such entity, and used in or derived


from such entity for a period of at least three


(3) years prior to the date of the transaction


from which the net capital gains arise,


b. “holding period” means an uninterrupted period of


time. The holding period shall include any additional


period when the property was held by another


individual or entity, if such additional period is


included in the taxpayer’s holding period for the

Req. No. 67 Page 26


asset pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended,


c. “Oklahoma company”, “limited liability company”, or


“partnership” means an entity whose primary


headquarters have been located in Oklahoma this state


for at least three (3) uninterrupted years prior to


the date of the transaction from which the net capital


gains arise,


d. “direct” means the taxpayer directly owns the asset,


and


e. “indirect” means the taxpayer owns an interest in a


pass-through entity (or chain of pass-through


entities) that sells the asset that gives rise to the


qualifying gains receiving capital treatment.


(1) With respect to sales of real property or


tangible personal property located within


Oklahoma this state, the deduction described in


this subsection shall not apply unless the pass-


through entity that makes the sale has held the


property for not less than five (5) uninterrupted


years prior to the date of the transaction that


created the capital gain, and each pass-through


entity included in the chain of ownership has


been a member, partner, or shareholder of the

Req. No. 67 Page 27


pass-through entity in the tier immediately below


it for an uninterrupted period of not less than


five (5) years.


(2) With respect to sales of stock or ownership


interest in or sales of all or substantially all


of the assets of an Oklahoma company, limited


liability company, or partnership, the deduction


described in this subsection shall not apply


unless the pass-through entity that makes the


sale has held the stock or ownership interest or


the assets for not less than three (3)


uninterrupted years prior to the date of the


transaction that created the capital gain, and


each pass-through entity included in the chain of


ownership has been a member, partner or


shareholder of the pass-through entity in the


tier immediately below it for an uninterrupted


period of not less than three (3) years.


E. The Oklahoma adjusted gross income of any individual


taxpayer shall be further adjusted as follows to arrive at Oklahoma


taxable income:


1. a. In the case of individuals, there shall be added or


deducted, as the case may be, the difference necessary


to allow personal exemptions of One Thousand Dollars

Req. No. 67 Page 28


($1,000.00) in lieu of the personal exemptions allowed


by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.


b. There shall be allowed an additional exemption of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each taxpayer or


spouse who is blind at the close of the tax year. For


purposes of this subparagraph, an individual is blind


only if the central visual acuity of the individual


does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with


correcting lenses, or if the visual acuity of the


individual is greater than 20/200, but is accompanied


by a limitation in the fields of vision such that the


widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle


no greater than twenty (20) degrees.


c. There shall be allowed an additional exemption of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each taxpayer or


spouse who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older at


the close of the tax year based upon the filing status


and federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer.


Taxpayers with the following filing status may claim


this exemption if the federal adjusted gross income


does not exceed:


(1) Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) if


married and filing jointly,



Req. No. 67 Page 29


(2) Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00)


if married and filing separately,


(3) Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) if single,


and


(4) Nineteen Thousand Dollars ($19,000.00) if a


qualifying head of household.


Provided, for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1999, amounts included in the calculation of


federal adjusted gross income pursuant to the


conversion of a traditional individual retirement


account to a Roth individual retirement account shall


be excluded from federal adjusted gross income for


purposes of the income thresholds provided in this


subparagraph.


2. a. For taxable years beginning on or before December 31,


2005, in the case of individuals who use the standard


deduction in determining taxable income, there shall


be added or deducted, as the case may be, the


difference necessary to allow a standard deduction in


lieu of the standard deduction allowed by the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in an amount equal


to the larger of fifteen percent (15%) of the Oklahoma


adjusted gross income or One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00), but not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars

Req. No. 67 Page 30


($2,000.00), except that in the case of a married


individual filing a separate return such deduction


shall be the larger of fifteen percent (15%) of such


Oklahoma adjusted gross income or Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00), but not to exceed the maximum amount of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).


b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,


2006, and before January 1, 2007, in the case of


individuals who use the standard deduction in


determining taxable income, there shall be added or


deducted, as the case may be, the difference necessary


to allow a standard deduction in lieu of the standard


deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, in an amount equal to:


(1) Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), if the filing


status is married filing joint, head of household


or qualifying widow, or


(2) Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), if the filing


status is single or married filing separate.


c. For the taxable year beginning on January 1, 2007, and


ending December 31, 2007, in the case of individuals


who use the standard deduction in determining taxable


income, there shall be added or deducted, as the case


may be, the difference necessary to allow a standard

Req. No. 67 Page 31


deduction in lieu of the standard deduction allowed by


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in an


amount equal to:


(1) Five Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($5,500.00),


if the filing status is married filing joint or


qualifying widow, or


(2) Four Thousand One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars


($4,125.00) for a head of household, or


(3) Two Thousand Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars


($2,750.00), if the filing status is single or


married filing separate.


d. For the taxable year beginning on January 1, 2008, and


ending December 31, 2008, in the case of individuals


who use the standard deduction in determining taxable


income, there shall be added or deducted, as the case


may be, the difference necessary to allow a standard


deduction in lieu of the standard deduction allowed by


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in an


amount equal to:


(1) Six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($6,500.00), if


the filing status is married filing joint or


qualifying widow,


(2) Four Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy-five Dollars


($4,875.00) for a head of household, or

Req. No. 67 Page 32


(3) Three Thousand Two Hundred Fifty Dollars


($3,250.00), if the filing status is single or


married filing separate.


e. For the taxable year beginning on January 1, 2009, and


ending December 31, 2009, in the case of individuals


who use the standard deduction in determining taxable


income, there shall be added or deducted, as the case


may be, the difference necessary to allow a standard


deduction in lieu of the standard deduction allowed by


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in an


amount equal to:


(1) Eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($8,500.00),


if the filing status is married filing joint or


qualifying widow,


(2) Six Thousand Three Hundred Seventy-five Dollars


($6,375.00) for a head of household, or


(3) Four Thousand Two Hundred Fifty Dollars


($4,250.00), if the filing status is single or


married filing separate.


Oklahoma adjusted gross income shall be increased by


any amounts paid for motor vehicle excise taxes which


were deducted as allowed by the Internal Revenue Code


of 1986, as amended.



Req. No. 67 Page 33


f. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,


2010, and ending on December 31, 2016, in the case of


individuals who use the standard deduction in


determining taxable income, there shall be added or


deducted, as the case may be, the difference necessary


to allow a standard deduction equal to the standard


deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, based upon the amount and filing


status prescribed by such Code for purposes of filing


federal individual income tax returns.


g. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,


2017, in the case of individuals who use the standard


deduction in determining taxable income, there shall


be added or deducted, as the case may be, the


difference necessary to allow a standard deduction in


lieu of the standard deduction allowed by the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as follows:


(1) Six Thousand Three Hundred Fifty Dollars


($6,350.00) for single or married filing


separately,


(2) Twelve Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars


($12,700.00) for married filing jointly or


qualifying widower with dependent child, and



Req. No. 67 Page 34


(3) Nine Thousand Three Hundred Fifty Dollars


($9,350.00) for head of household.


3. a. In the case of resident and part-year resident


individuals having adjusted gross income from sources


both within and without the state, the itemized or


standard deductions and personal exemptions shall be


reduced to an amount which is the same portion of the


total thereof as Oklahoma adjusted gross income is of


adjusted gross income. To the extent itemized


deductions include allowable moving expense, proration


of moving expense shall not be required or permitted


but allowable moving expense shall be fully deductible


for those taxpayers moving within or into Oklahoma


this state and no part of moving expense shall be


deductible for those taxpayers moving without or out


of Oklahoma this state. All other itemized or


standard deductions and personal exemptions shall be


subject to proration as provided by law.


b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,


2018, the net amount of itemized deductions allowable


on an Oklahoma income tax return, subject to the


provisions of paragraph 24 of this subsection, shall


not exceed Seventeen Thousand Dollars ($17,000.00).


For purposes of this subparagraph, charitable

Req. No. 67 Page 35


contributions and medical expenses deductible for


federal income tax purposes shall be excluded from the


amount of Seventeen Thousand Dollars ($17,000.00) as


specified by this subparagraph.


4. A resident individual with a physical disability


constituting a substantial handicap to employment may deduct from


Oklahoma adjusted gross income such expenditures to modify a motor


vehicle, home or workplace as are necessary to compensate for his or


her handicap. A veteran certified by the United States Department


of Veterans Affairs of the federal government as having a service-


connected disability shall be conclusively presumed to be an


individual with a physical disability constituting a substantial


handicap to employment. The Tax Commission shall promulgate rules


containing a list of combinations of common disabilities and


modifications which may be presumed to qualify for this deduction.


The Tax Commission shall prescribe necessary requirements for


verification.


5. a. Before July 1, 2010, the first One Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) received by any person


from the United States as salary or compensation in


any form, other than retirement benefits, as a member


of any component of the Armed Forces of the United


States shall be deducted from taxable income.



Req. No. 67 Page 36


b. On or after July 1, 2010, one hundred percent (100%)


of the income received by any person from the United


States as salary or compensation in any form, other


than retirement benefits, as a member of any component


of the Armed Forces of the United States shall be


deducted from taxable income.


c. Whenever the filing of a timely income tax return by a


member of the Armed Forces of the United States is


made impracticable or impossible of accomplishment by


reason of:


(1) absence from the United States, which term


includes only the states and the District of


Columbia,


(2) absence from the State of Oklahoma this state


while on active duty, or


(3) confinement in a hospital within the United


States for treatment of wounds, injuries or


disease,


the time for filing a return and paying an income tax


shall be and is hereby extended without incurring


liability for interest or penalties, to the fifteenth


day of the third month following the month in which:


(a) Such individual shall return to the United


States if the extension is granted pursuant

Req. No. 67 Page 37


to subparagraph a division 1 of this


paragraph subparagraph, return to the State


of Oklahoma this state if the extension is


granted pursuant to subparagraph b division


of this paragraph subparagraph or be


discharged from such hospital if the


extension is granted pursuant to


subparagraph c division 3 of this paragraph


subparagraph, or


(b) An executor, administrator, or conservator


of the estate of the taxpayer is appointed,


whichever event occurs the earliest.


Provided, that the Tax Commission may, in its discretion, grant


any member of the Armed Forces of the United States an extension of


time for filing of income tax returns and payment of income tax


without incurring liabilities for interest or penalties. Such


extension may be granted only when in the judgment of the Tax


Commission a good cause exists therefor and may be for a period in


excess of six (6) months. A record of every such extension granted,


and the reason therefor, shall be kept.


6. Before July 1, 2010, the salary or any other form of


compensation, received from the United States by a member of any


component of the Armed Forces of the United States, shall be


deducted from taxable income during the time in which the person is

Req. No. 67 Page 38


detained by the enemy in a conflict, is a prisoner of war or is


missing in action and not deceased; provided, after July 1, 2010,


all such salary or compensation shall be subject to the deduction as


provided pursuant to paragraph 5 of this subsection.


7. a. An individual taxpayer, whether resident or


nonresident, may deduct an amount equal to the federal


income taxes paid by the taxpayer during the taxable


year.


b. Federal taxes as described in subparagraph a of this


paragraph shall be deductible by any individual


taxpayer, whether resident or nonresident, only to the


extent they relate to income subject to taxation


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Income Tax


Act. The maximum amount allowable in the preceding


paragraph 5 of this subsection shall be prorated on


the ratio of the Oklahoma adjusted gross income to


federal adjusted gross income.


c. For the purpose of this paragraph, “federal income


taxes paid” shall mean federal income taxes, surtaxes


imposed on incomes or excess profits taxes, as though


the taxpayer was on the accrual basis. In determining


the amount of deduction for federal income taxes for


tax year 2001, the amount of the deduction shall not


be adjusted by the amount of any accelerated ten

Req. No. 67 Page 39


percent (10%) tax rate bracket credit or advanced


refund of the credit received during the tax year


provided pursuant to the federal Economic Growth and


Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, P.L. No. 107-


16, and the advanced refund of such credit shall not


be subject to taxation.


d. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to all


taxable years ending after December 31, 1978, and


beginning before January 1, 2006.


8. Retirement benefits not to exceed Five Thousand Five Hundred


Dollars ($5,500.00) for the 2004 tax year, Seven Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for the 2005 tax year and Ten Thousand


Dollars ($10,000.00) for the 2006 tax year and all subsequent tax


years, which are received by an individual from the civil service of


the United States, the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System,


the Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma, the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Retirement System, the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and


Retirement System, the Oklahoma Police Pension and Retirement


System, the employee retirement systems created by counties pursuant


to Section 951 et seq. of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the The


Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges, the Oklahoma


Wildlife Conservation Department Retirement Fund, the Oklahoma


Employment Security Commission Retirement Plan, or the employee


retirement systems created by municipalities pursuant to Section 48-

Req. No. 67 Page 40


101 et seq. of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be exempt


from taxable income.


9. In taxable years beginning after December 3l, 1984, Social


Security benefits received by an individual shall be exempt from


taxable income, to the extent such benefits are included in the


federal adjusted gross income pursuant to the provisions of Section


of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 86.


10. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1994, lump-


sum distributions from employer plans of deferred compensation,


which are not qualified plans within the meaning of Section 401(a)


of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


401(a), and which are deposited in and accounted for within a


separate bank account or brokerage account in a financial


institution within this state, shall be excluded from taxable income


in the same manner as a qualifying rollover contribution to an


individual retirement account within the meaning of Section 408 of


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


408. Amounts withdrawn from such bank or brokerage account,


including any earnings thereon, shall be included in taxable income


when withdrawn in the same manner as withdrawals from individual


retirement accounts within the meaning of Section 408 of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.



Req. No. 67 Page 41


11. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 1995,


contributions made to and interest received from a medical savings


account established pursuant to Sections 2621 through 2623 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be exempt from taxable income.


12. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1996, the


Oklahoma adjusted gross income of any individual taxpayer who is a


swine or poultry producer may be further adjusted for the deduction


for depreciation allowed for new construction or expansion costs


which may be computed using the same depreciation method elected for


federal income tax purposes except that the useful life shall be


seven (7) years for purposes of this paragraph. If depreciation is


allowed as a deduction in determining the adjusted gross income of


an individual, any depreciation calculated and claimed pursuant to


this section shall in no event be a duplication of any depreciation


allowed or permitted on the federal income tax return of the


individual.


13. a. In taxable years beginning before January 1, 2005,


retirement benefits not to exceed the amounts


specified in this paragraph, which are received by an


individual sixty-five (65) years of age or older and


whose Oklahoma adjusted gross income is Twenty-five


Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or less if the filing


status is single, head of household, or married filing


separate, or Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or

Req. No. 67 Page 42


less if the filing status is married filing joint or


qualifying widow, shall be exempt from taxable income.


In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004,


retirement benefits not to exceed the amounts


specified in this paragraph, which are received by an


individual whose Oklahoma adjusted gross income is


less than the qualifying amount specified in this


paragraph, shall be exempt from taxable income.


b. For purposes of this paragraph, the qualifying amount


shall be as follows:


(1) in taxable years beginning after December 31,


2004, and prior to January 1, 2007, the


qualifying amount shall be Thirty-seven Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($37,500.00) or less if the


filing status is single, head of household, or


married filing separate, or Seventy-five Thousand


Dollars ($75,000.00) or less if the filing status


is married filing jointly or qualifying widow,


(2) in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2007,


the qualifying amount shall be Fifty Thousand


Dollars ($50,000.00) or less if the filing status


is single, head of household, or married filing


separate, or One Hundred Thousand Dollars



Req. No. 67 Page 43


($100,000.00) or less if the filing status is


married filing jointly or qualifying widow,


(3) in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2008,


the qualifying amount shall be Sixty-two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($62,500.00) or less if the


filing status is single, head of household, or


married filing separate, or One Hundred Twenty-


five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00) or less if


the filing status is married filing jointly or


qualifying widow,


(4) in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2009,


the qualifying amount shall be One Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or less if the


filing status is single, head of household, or


married filing separate, or Two Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($200,000.00) or less if the filing


status is married filing jointly or qualifying


widow, and


(5) in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2010,


and subsequent taxable years, there shall be no


limitation upon the qualifying amount.


c. For purposes of this paragraph, “retirement benefits”


means the total distributions or withdrawals from the


following:

Req. No. 67 Page 44


(1) an employee pension benefit plan which satisfies


the requirements of Section 401 of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 401,


(2) an eligible deferred compensation plan that


satisfies the requirements of Section 457 of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 457,


(3) an individual retirement account, annuity or


trust or simplified employee pension that


satisfies the requirements of Section 408 of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 408,


(4) an employee annuity subject to the provisions of


Section 403(a) or (b) of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


403(a) or (b),


(5) United States Retirement Bonds which satisfy the


requirements of Section 86 of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 86, or


(6) lump-sum distributions from a retirement plan


which satisfies the requirements of Section



Req. No. 67 Page 45


402(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 402(e).


d. The amount of the exemption provided by this paragraph


shall be limited to Five Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($5,500.00) for the 2004 tax year, Seven Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for the 2005 tax year and


Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the tax year


2006 and for all subsequent tax years. Any individual


who claims the exemption provided for in paragraph 8


of this subsection shall not be permitted to claim a


combined total exemption pursuant to this paragraph


and paragraph 8 of this subsection in an amount


exceeding Five Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($5,500.00) for the 2004 tax year, Seven Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for the 2005 tax year and


Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the 2006 tax


year and all subsequent tax years.


14. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 1999, for an


individual engaged in production agriculture who has filed a


Schedule F form with the taxpayer’s federal income tax return for


such taxable year, there shall be excluded from taxable income any


amount which was included as federal taxable income or federal


adjusted gross income and which consists of the discharge of an



Req. No. 67 Page 46


obligation by a creditor of the taxpayer incurred to finance the


production of agricultural products.


15. In taxable years beginning December 31, 2000, an amount


equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of any scholarship


or stipend received from participation in the Oklahoma Police Corps


Program, as established in Section 2-140.3 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes shall be exempt from taxable income.


16. a. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2001,


and before January 1, 2005, there shall be allowed a


deduction in the amount of contributions to accounts


established pursuant to the Oklahoma College Savings


Plan Act. The deduction shall equal the amount of


contributions to accounts, but in no event shall the


deduction for each contributor exceed Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) each taxable year for


each account.


b. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004,


each taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction for


contributions to accounts established pursuant to the


Oklahoma College Savings Plan Act. The maximum annual


deduction shall equal the amount of contributions to


all such accounts plus any contributions to such


accounts by the taxpayer for prior taxable years after


December 31, 2004, which were not deducted, but in no

Req. No. 67 Page 47


event shall the deduction for each tax year exceed Ten


Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each individual


taxpayer or Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) for


taxpayers filing a joint return. Any amount of a


contribution that is not deducted by the taxpayer in


the year for which the contribution is made may be


carried forward as a deduction from income for the


succeeding five (5) years. For taxable years


beginning after December 31, 2005, deductions may be


taken for contributions and rollovers made during a


taxable year and up to April 15 of the succeeding


year, or the due date of a taxpayer’s state income tax


return, excluding extensions, whichever is later.


Provided, a deduction for the same contribution may


not be taken for two (2) different taxable years.


c. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2006,


deductions for contributions made pursuant to


subparagraph b of this paragraph shall be limited as


follows:


(1) for a taxpayer who qualified for the five-year


carryforward election and who takes a rollover or


nonqualified withdrawal during that period, the


tax deduction otherwise available pursuant to


subparagraph b of this paragraph shall be reduced

Req. No. 67 Page 48


by the amount which is equal to the rollover or


nonqualified withdrawal, and


(2) for a taxpayer who elects to take a rollover or


nonqualified withdrawal within the same tax year


in which a contribution was made to the


taxpayer’s account, the tax deduction otherwise


available pursuant to subparagraph b of this


paragraph shall be reduced by the amount of the


contribution which is equal to the rollover or


nonqualified withdrawal.


d. If a taxpayer elects to take a rollover on a


contribution for which a deduction has been taken


pursuant to subparagraph b of this paragraph within


one (1) year of the date of contribution, the amount


of such rollover shall be included in the adjusted


gross income of the taxpayer in the taxable year of


the rollover.


e. If a taxpayer makes a nonqualified withdrawal of


contributions for which a deduction was taken pursuant


to subparagraph b of this paragraph, such nonqualified


withdrawal and any earnings thereon shall be included


in the adjusted gross income of the taxpayer in the


taxable year of the nonqualified withdrawal.


f. As used in this paragraph:

Req. No. 67 Page 49


(1) “non-qualified withdrawal” means a withdrawal


from an Oklahoma College Savings Plan account


other than one of the following:


(a) a qualified withdrawal,


(b) a withdrawal made as a result of the death


or disability of the designated beneficiary


of an account,


(c) a withdrawal that is made on the account of


a scholarship or the allowance or payment


described in Section 135(d)(1)(B) or (C) or


by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, received by the designated


beneficiary to the extent the amount of the


refund does not exceed the amount of the


scholarship, allowance, or payment, or


(d) a rollover or change of designated


beneficiary as permitted by subsection F of


Section 3970.7 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and


(2) “rollover” means the transfer of funds from the


Oklahoma College Savings Plan to any other plan


under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended.



Req. No. 67 Page 50


17. For tax years 2006 through 2021, retirement benefits


received by an individual from any component of the Armed Forces of


the United States in an amount not to exceed the greater of seventy-


five percent (75%) of such benefits or Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) shall be exempt from taxable income but in no case less


than the amount of the exemption provided by paragraph 13 of this


subsection. For tax year 2022 and subsequent tax years, retirement


benefits received by an individual from any component of the Armed


Forces of the United States shall be exempt from taxable income.


18. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2006,


retirement benefits received by federal civil service retirees,


including survivor annuities, paid in lieu of Social Security


benefits shall be exempt from taxable income to the extent such


benefits are included in the federal adjusted gross income pursuant


to the provisions of Section 86 of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 86, according to the following


schedule:


a. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2007, twenty


percent (20%) of such benefits shall be exempt,


b. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2008, forty


percent (40%) of such benefits shall be exempt,


c. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2009, sixty


percent (60%) of such benefits shall be exempt,



Req. No. 67 Page 51


d. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2010, eighty


percent (80%) of such benefits shall be exempt, and


e. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2011, and


subsequent taxable years, one hundred percent (100%)


of such benefits shall be exempt.


19. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2007, a


resident individual may deduct up to Ten Thousand


Dollars ($10,000.00) from Oklahoma adjusted gross


income if the individual, or the dependent of the


individual, while living, donates one or more human


organs of the individual to another human being for


human organ transplantation. As used in this


paragraph, “human organ” means all or part of a liver,


pancreas, kidney, intestine, lung, or bone marrow. A


deduction that is claimed under this paragraph may be


claimed in the taxable year in which the human organ


transplantation occurs.


b. An individual may claim this deduction only once, and


the deduction may be claimed only for unreimbursed


expenses that are incurred by the individual and


related to the organ donation of the individual.


c. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this paragraph which shall


contain a specific list of expenses which may be

Req. No. 67 Page 52


presumed to qualify for the deduction. The Tax


Commission shall prescribe necessary requirements for


verification.


20. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2009, there


shall be exempt from taxable income any amount received by the


beneficiary of the death benefit for an emergency medical technician


or a registered emergency medical responder provided by Section 1-


2505.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


21. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2008,


taxable income shall be increased by any unemployment compensation


exempted under Section 85(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 85(c)(2009).


22. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2008, there


shall be exempt from taxable income any payment in an amount less


than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) received by a person as an award


for participation in a competitive livestock show event. For


purposes of this paragraph, the payment shall be treated as a


scholarship amount paid by the entity sponsoring the event and the


sponsoring entity shall cause the payment to be categorized as a


scholarship in its books and records.


23. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016,


taxable income shall be increased by any amount of state and local


sales or income taxes deducted under 26 U.S.C., Section 164 of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. If the amount of state

Req. No. 67 Page 53


and local taxes deducted on the federal return is limited, taxable


income on the state return shall be increased only by the amount


actually deducted after any such limitations are applied.


24. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020, each


taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction for contributions to accounts


established pursuant to the Achieving a Better Life Experience


(ABLE) Program program as established in Section 4001.1 et seq. of


Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes. For any tax year, the deduction


provided for in this paragraph shall not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) for an individual taxpayer or Twenty Thousand Dollars


($20,000.00) for taxpayers filing a joint return. Any amount of


contribution not deducted by the taxpayer in the tax year for which


the contribution is made may be carried forward as a deduction from


income for up to five (5) tax years. Deductions may be taken for


contributions made during the tax year and through April 15 of the


succeeding tax year, or through the due date of a taxpayer’s state


income tax return excluding extensions, whichever is later.


Provided, a deduction for the same contribution may not be taken in


more than one (1) tax year.


25. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, income reported


as tips pursuant to Internal Revenue Service Form 4137 and written


or electronic tip statements provided to an employer pursuant to 26


U.S.C., Section 6053 shall be exempt from taxable income.



Req. No. 67 Page 54


F. 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004, a


deduction from the Oklahoma adjusted gross income of any individual


taxpayer shall be allowed for qualifying gains receiving capital


treatment that are included in the federal adjusted gross income of


such individual taxpayer during the taxable year.


2. As used in this subsection:


a. “qualifying gains receiving capital treatment” means


the amount of net capital gains, as defined in Section


1222(11) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, included in an individual taxpayer’s federal


income tax return that result from:


(1) the sale of real property or tangible personal


property located within Oklahoma this state that


has been directly or indirectly owned by the


individual taxpayer for a holding period of at


least five (5) years prior to the date of the


transaction from which such net capital gains


arise,


(2) the sale of stock or the sale of a direct or


indirect ownership interest in an Oklahoma


company, limited liability company, or


partnership where such stock or ownership


interest has been directly or indirectly owned by


the individual taxpayer for a holding period of

Req. No. 67 Page 55


at least two (2) years prior to the date of the


transaction from which the net capital gains


arise, or


(3) the sale of real property, tangible personal


property or intangible personal property located


within Oklahoma this state as part of the sale of


all or substantially all of the assets of an


Oklahoma company, limited liability company, or


partnership or an Oklahoma proprietorship


business enterprise where such property has been


directly or indirectly owned by such entity or


business enterprise or owned by the owners of


such entity or business enterprise for a period


of at least two (2) years prior to the date of


the transaction from which the net capital gains


arise,


b. “holding period” means an uninterrupted period of


time. The holding period shall include any additional


period when the property was held by another


individual or entity, if such additional period is


included in the taxpayer’s holding period for the


asset pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended,



Req. No. 67 Page 56


c. “Oklahoma company,” “limited liability company,” or


“partnership” means an entity whose primary


headquarters have been located in Oklahoma this state


for at least three (3) uninterrupted years prior to


the date of the transaction from which the net capital


gains arise,


d. “direct” means the individual taxpayer directly owns


the asset,


e. “indirect” means the individual taxpayer owns an


interest in a pass-through entity (or chain of pass-


through entities) that sells the asset that gives rise


to the qualifying gains receiving capital treatment.


(1) With respect to sales of real property or


tangible personal property located within


Oklahoma this state, the deduction described in


this subsection shall not apply unless the pass-


through entity that makes the sale has held the


property for not less than five (5) uninterrupted


years prior to the date of the transaction that


created the capital gain, and each pass-through


entity included in the chain of ownership has


been a member, partner, or shareholder of the


pass-through entity in the tier immediately below



Req. No. 67 Page 57


it for an uninterrupted period of not less than


five (5) years.


(2) With respect to sales of stock or ownership


interest in or sales of all or substantially all


of the assets of an Oklahoma company, limited


liability company, partnership or Oklahoma


proprietorship business enterprise, the deduction


described in this subsection shall not apply


unless the pass-through entity that makes the


sale has held the stock or ownership interest for


not less than two (2) uninterrupted years prior


to the date of the transaction that created the


capital gain, and each pass-through entity


included in the chain of ownership has been a


member, partner or shareholder of the pass-


through entity in the tier immediately below it


for an uninterrupted period of not less than two


(2) years. For purposes of this division,


uninterrupted ownership prior to July 1, 2007,


shall be included in the determination of the


required holding period prescribed by this


division, and


f. “Oklahoma proprietorship business enterprise” means a


business enterprise whose income and expenses have

Req. No. 67 Page 58


been reported on Schedule C or F of an individual


taxpayer’s federal income tax return, or any similar


successor schedule published by the Internal Revenue


Service and whose primary headquarters have been


located in Oklahoma this state for at least three (3)


uninterrupted years prior to the date of the


transaction from which the net capital gains arise.


G. 1. For purposes of computing its Oklahoma taxable income


under this section, the dividends-paid deduction otherwise allowed


by federal law in computing net income of a real estate investment


trust that is subject to federal income tax shall be added back in


computing the tax imposed by this state under this title if the real


estate investment trust is a captive real estate investment trust.


2. For purposes of computing its Oklahoma taxable income under


this section, a taxpayer shall add back otherwise deductible rents


and interest expenses paid to a captive real estate investment trust


that is not subject to the provisions of paragraph 1 of this


subsection. As used in this subsection:


a. the term “real estate investment trust” or “REIT”


means the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 856


of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


b. the term “captive real estate investment trust” means


a real estate investment trust, the shares or


beneficial interests of which are not regularly traded

Req. No. 67 Page 59


on an established securities market and more than


fifty percent (50%) of the voting power or value of


the beneficial interests or shares of which are owned


or controlled, directly or indirectly, or


constructively, by a single entity that is:


(1) treated as an association taxable as a


corporation under the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and


(2) not exempt from federal income tax pursuant to


the provisions of Section 501(a) of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.


The term shall not include a real estate investment


trust that is intended to be regularly traded on an


established securities market, and that satisfies the


requirements of Section 856(a)(5) and (6) of the U.S.


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, by reason


of Section 856(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended,


c. the term “association taxable as a corporation” shall


not include the following entities:


(1) any real estate investment trust as defined in


paragraph a of this subsection other than a


“captive real estate investment trust” captive


real estate investment trust,

Req. No. 67 Page 60


(2) any qualified real estate investment trust


subsidiary under Section 856(i) of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, other than a


qualified REIT subsidiary of a “captive real


estate investment trust” captive real estate


investment trust,


(3) any Listed Australian Property Trust listed


Australian property trust (meaning an Australian


unit trust registered as a “Managed Investment


Scheme” “managed investment scheme” under the


Australian Corporations Act 2001 in which the


principal class of units is listed on a


recognized stock exchange in Australia and is


regularly traded on an established securities


market), or an entity organized as a trust,


provided that a Listed Australian Property Trust


listed Australian property trust owns or


controls, directly or indirectly, seventy-five


percent (75%) or more of the voting power or


value of the beneficial interests or shares of


such trust, or


(4) any Qualified Foreign Entity qualified foreign


entity, meaning a corporation, trust, association


or partnership organized outside the laws of the

Req. No. 67 Page 61


United States and which satisfies the following


criteria:


(a) at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the


entity’s total asset value at the close of


its taxable year is represented by real


estate assets, as defined in Section


856(c)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, thereby including shares


or certificates of beneficial interest in


any real estate investment trust, cash and


cash equivalents, and U.S. Government


securities,


(b) the entity receives a dividend-paid


deduction comparable to Section 561 of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


or is exempt from entity level tax,


(c) the entity is required to distribute at


least eighty-five percent (85%) of its


taxable income, as computed in the


jurisdiction in which it is organized, to


the holders of its shares or certificates of


beneficial interest on an annual basis,


(d) not more than ten percent (10%) of the


voting power or value in such entity is held

Req. No. 67 Page 62


directly or indirectly or constructively by


a single entity or individual, or the shares


or beneficial interests of such entity are


regularly traded on an established


securities market, and


(e) the entity is organized in a country which


has a tax treaty with the United States.


3. For purposes of this subsection, the constructive ownership


rules of Section 318(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by


Section 856(d)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


shall apply in determining the ownership of stock, assets, or net


profits of any person.


4. A real estate investment trust that does not become


regularly traded on an established securities market within one (1)


year of the date on which it first becomes a real estate investment


trust shall be deemed not to have been regularly traded on an


established securities market, retroactive to the date it first


became a real estate investment trust, and shall file an amended


return reflecting such retroactive designation for any tax year or


part year occurring during its initial year of status as a real


estate investment trust. For purposes of this subsection, a real


estate investment trust becomes a real estate investment trust on


the first day it has both met the requirements of Section 856 of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and has elected to be

Req. No. 67 Page 63


treated as a real estate investment trust pursuant to Section


856(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-67 QD 12/20/2024 6:52:24 PM







































Req. No. 67 Page 64